trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menneske__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="duel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgerne</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øger</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ja__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paryk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/ånd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånden</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånd</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fløjl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="æg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>get</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mis__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ser</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fængs/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bjælkehus"><i>bjælkehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralsygehus"><i>centralsygehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etplanshus"><i>etplanshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flerfamiliehus"><i>flerfamiliehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrstehus"><i>fyrstehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="højhus"><i>højhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klubhus"><i>klubhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavenergihus"><i>lavenergihus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="operahus"><i>operahus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punkthus"><i>punkthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toetagershus"><i>toetagershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ærmeblad"><i>ærmeblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altangangshus"><i>altangangshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artsnavn"><i>artsnavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bånd"><i>bånd</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biled"><i>biled</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøg"><i>bøg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bræddegulv"><i>bræddegulv</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bryghus"><i>bryghus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkustelt"><i>cirkustelt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dej"><i>dej</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drog"><i>drog</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egennavn"><i>egennavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exitskilt"><i>exitskilt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="femetagershus"><i>femetagershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firmanavn"><i>firmanavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flerfamiliershus"><i>flerfamiliershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forbjerg"><i>forbjerg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forretningsbrev"><i>forretningsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrfad"><i>fyrfad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gårdhavehus"><i>gårdhavehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glashus"><i>glashus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hank"><i>hank</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hold"><i>hold</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyttefad"><i>hyttefad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kælenavn"><i>kælenavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirkeskib"><i>kirkeskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kødbjerg"><i>kødbjerg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kranhus"><i>kranhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvaj"><i>kvaj</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lav"><i>lav</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyn"><i>lyn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="missionshus"><i>missionshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyhedsbrev"><i>nyhedsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opland"><i>opland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pantebrev"><i>pantebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pjevs"><i>pjevs</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rådhus"><i>rådhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rør"><i>rør</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="r"><i>r</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="særtog"><i>særtog</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sengebord"><i>sengebord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skærm"><i>skærm</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skoleskib"><i>skoleskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulderblad"><i>skulderblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smædenavn"><i>smædenavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snork"><i>snork</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spaltegulv"><i>spaltegulv</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stikbrev"><i>stikbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrehus"><i>styrehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svigt"><i>svigt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankskib"><i>tankskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="test"><i>test</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toneskift"><i>toneskift</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trempeltag"><i>trempeltag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udhængsskab"><i>udhængsskab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udviklingsland"><i>udviklingsland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valgbord"><i>valgbord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinkelhus"><i>vinkelhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
